Utah statutes.
58-72-502.   Penalty for unlawful conduct.

(1)  Any person who violates the unlawful conduct provision defined in Subsection 58-1-501(1)(a) is guilty of a third degree felony.

(2)  Any person who violates any of the unlawful conduct provisions defined in Subsections 58-1-501(1)(b) through (e) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

